Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
PART 13
ENHANCED DRUG INTERDICTION
AND ENFORCEMENT ROLE
FOR THE NATIONAL GUARD

28-3-1301. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that drug abuse and drug trafficking are matters of statewide concern and further declares that the state should take advantage of assistance offered by the National Guard in fighting against the spread of drug trafficking and abuse in the state.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire part added, p. 1253, § 1, effective April 12.

28-3-1302. Commander in chief - order for plan.

The governor, as commander in chief, shall order the adjutant general of the National Guard to prepare, in cooperation with the Colorado bureau of investigation, a drug interdiction and enforcement plan for submission to the secretary of defense of the United States.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire part added, p. 1253, § 1, effective April 12.

28-3-1303. Drug interdiction and enforcement plan - requirements.

The drug interdiction and enforcement plan required by this part 13 shall be in compliance with the provisions set forth in Pub.L. 100-456, section 1105, and shall specifically request the secretary of defense to provide sufficient funds for the pay, allowances, clothing, subsistence, gratuities, travel, and related expenses of personnel of the National Guard when utilized in conjunction with the plan. The plan shall specify that such funds are to be used solely for the purpose of drug interdiction and enforcement operations and for the operation and maintenance of the equipment and facilities of the National Guard when used in conjunction with such plan.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, when participating in operations pursuant to the drug interdiction and enforcement plan required by this part 13, the National Guard shall be considered a law enforcement agency of the state for purposes of accepting, receiving, disposing of, and expending the property and proceeds from any property forfeited to the federal government and allocated to the National Guard pursuant to section 16-13-601, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire part added, p. 1253, § 1, effective April 12.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 444, § 3, effective August 3.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2007 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 117, Session Laws of Colorado 2007.

28-3-1304. Drug interdiction and enforcement plan - limitations.

The plan shall state specifically that any drug interdiction and enforcement plan approved by the secretary of defense shall be conducted at a time when personnel of the National Guard are not in federal service. The plan shall also specifically state that participation by National Guard personnel in such operations is service in addition to annual training required under section 502 of title 32, United States Code.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire part added, p. 1254, § 1, effective April 12.

28-3-1305. Department of military and veterans affairs counterdrug program federal forfeiture fund - creation.

Any moneys accepted by the adjutant general pursuant to section 16-13-601, C.R.S., shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the department of military and veterans affairs counterdrug program federal forfeiture fund, which fund is hereby created in the state treasury and referred to in this section as the "fund". All interest and income derived from the investment and deposit of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the fund. Any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not be credited or transferred to the general fund or another fund. Moneys in the fund shall be continuously appropriated to the department for use by the adjutant general in compliance with state and federal law.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 444, § 4, effective August 3.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2007 act enacting this section, see section 1 of chapter 117, Session Laws of Colorado 2007.